Oklahoma, session 2025, SB722.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 1-3, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-3. For the purposes of the Oklahoma Agricultural


Code, unless the context indicates otherwise:


1. “Authorized agent” means a person who has been authorized by


the State Board of Agriculture to act on behalf of the Board in


making investigations, inspections, performing other services, or


doing any particular act or acts which have been vested by the


Oklahoma Agricultural Code in the Board. A written or printed


commission signed by the President of the Board shall be proof that



Req. No. 834 Page 1


the holder has lawful authority to act on behalf of the Board in


implementing the Oklahoma Agricultural Code;


2. “Beef” means the flesh of a bovine animal;


3. “Beef product” means the edible products produced in whole


or in part from beef, excluding milk and milk products;


4. “Board” means the State Board of Agriculture;


5. “Code” means the Oklahoma Agricultural Code;


6. “Department” means the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture,


Food, and Forestry and its employees, officers, and divisions.


Whenever the name “Department of Agriculture” Department of


Agriculture appears in any law, contract or other document, it shall


be deemed to refer to the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food,


and Forestry;


7. “Director” means the Director of a division established in


the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry;


8. “License” means a written document issued by the Board


granting authority to a person to engage in a business, occupation,


or activity;


9. “Livestock” or “animals” means any cattle, bison, horses,


sheep, goats, asses, mules, swine, domesticated rabbits, and


chickens, turkeys, and other domesticated fowl, and any animal or


bird in captivity;


10. “Official identification” means any official method of


identification approved by USDA the United States Department of

Req. No. 834 Page 2


Agriculture, as described by 9 C.F.R., § Section 86.1, or the State


Veterinarian; provided, that no official identification shall be


used to monitor electronically any animal of this state. Official


identification for specific species may be further defined within


the applicable section of the Oklahoma Administrative Code.


Backtags shall not be considered official identification unless the


animal is shipped directly to slaughter. The term “official ear


tag” is synonymous with “official identification” official


identification;


11. “Permit” means a written document issued by the Board


giving consent for a person to engage in an activity;


12. “Person” means the state, any municipality, political


subdivision, institution, individual, public or private corporation,


partnership, association, firm, company, public trust, joint-stock


company, trust, estate, state or federal agency, other governmental


entity, or any other legal entity or an agent, employee,


representative, assignee or successor thereof;


13. “Pork” means the flesh of a porcine animal;


14. “Pork products” means a product or byproduct produced in


whole or in part from pork;


15. “President” means the President of the State Board of


Agriculture. The President of the State Board of Agriculture shall


also be designated as the Commissioner of Agriculture;



Req. No. 834 Page 3


16. “Producer” means any person planting, raising, growing, or


harvesting agricultural products;


17. “Quarantine” means a written document issued by the Board


to restrict the movement of animals, birds, plants, or agricultural


commodities into or out of a specified area for the control or


prevention of diseases or pests; and


18. “Stop sale order” or “stop use order” means a written or


printed order signed by the President or authorized agent of the


Board, prohibiting the sale, offering for sale, exposure for sale,


or use of any agricultural product, article, device, service, or


commodity covered by the Oklahoma Agricultural Code.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 4-20, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 4-20. A. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food,


and Forestry shall be the official animal identification agency of


the state and shall be the official agency of the state in any


dealings between this state and the United States Department of


Agriculture, any other federal agency, or any agency or person of


this or another state on matters pertaining to animal


identification.


B. It is the intent of the Oklahoma State Legislature to direct


and authorize the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and


Forestry to develop, implement, and administer an Oklahoma Animal


Identification Program that achieves the following goals:

Req. No. 834 Page 4


1. Enhance disease preparedness by rapidly identifying animals


exposed to disease, thus allowing quick detection, containment, and


elimination of disease threats;


2. Promote continued confidence in animal products and to


protect the health status of Oklahoma’s herds and flocks;


3. Identify infected and exposed premises, animals, and groups


of animals;


4. Develop a comprehensive infrastructure that utilizes state-


of-the-art national and international standards with the best


available and practical technologies for the collection and


recording of livestock and food animal movements; and


5. Be dynamic and flexible, and incorporate new and proven


technologies as they become available.


C. The Department shall be authorized to promulgate rules for


the implementation and administration of the Oklahoma Animal


Identification Program, if one of the following occurs:


1. The United States Department of Agriculture issues proposed


or final rules or requirements for the implementation of a national


animal identification or premises registration program;


2. The United States Congress enacts requirements for a


national animal identification or premises registration system; or


3. Another state establishes requirements for animal


identification or premises registration affecting the importation of


livestock from Oklahoma.

Req. No. 834 Page 5


D. Any rules promulgated by the Department pursuant to this


section that may be reasonably necessary to implement the Oklahoma


Animal Identification Program may include the following:


1. Premises identification;


2. Individual animal identification;


3. Group and lot animal identification;


4. Specifications and standards for the identification


technologies used to track and trace animal movements; provided,


that the rule shall not be used to monitor electronically any animal


of this state;


5. Record keeping; and


6. Protecting and improving the health of Oklahoma livestock


and food animals.


E. The Department may charge fees; however, the fees shall be


limited to the actual costs of the Department for the implementation


and administration of the Oklahoma Animal Identification Program.


F. Pursuant to this section and rules promulgated pursuant


thereto, any data or records provided to the Department by persons


regarding premises or animal identification, including the name and


address of the provider, shall be kept confidential except in the


following circumstances:


1. Federal law requires the information for a National Animal


Identification national animal identification program;



Req. No. 834 Page 6


2. The Department deems release of confidential information to


other state and federal agencies is necessary for disease control


and disease traceback;


3. The information is needed to assist law enforcement


officials in livestock recovery and theft investigations; and


4. The Department may release information as needed to assist


in criminal investigations or tracebacks concerning violations of


state or federal pharmacy acts and drug residues.


G. In the event that information regarding premises or animal


identification is provided to other individuals or entities, the


information shall be specific and not cumulative.


H. A court shall quash any subpoena commanding the disclosure


of confidential information or records of the Department.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-834 MR 1/19/2025 5:42:01 AM

















Req. No. 834 Page 7